South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4799.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Certificate of Need exemptions SECTION 1.    Section 44-7-170(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) This article does not apply to: (1) construction of a new hospital with up to fifty beds in any county currently without a hospital; (2) hospitals owned by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and operated by the Office of Mental Health and the Office of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, except an addition of one or more beds to the total number of beds of the predecessor departments' health care facilities existing on July 1, 1988; (3) any federal hospital sponsored and operated by this State; (4) hospitals owned and operated by the federal government; (5) veterans' homes owned and operated by the South Carolina Department of Veterans' Affairs. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________